Nebraska, session 109, LB191.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB191 LB191
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-2325.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
76-2325.01 Any person who willfully and maliciously breaks, injures,
destroys, or otherwise interferes with the poles, wires, or other
facilities of any telecommunications, broadband, communications, or
railroad company or electric light and power company in this state or who
willfully and purposely interrupts or interferes with the transmission of
telecommunications, broadband, communications, messages or the
transmission of light, heat, and power in this state shall be subject to
the action and penalty prescribed in section 28-519.
Sec. 2. Original section 76-2325.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-